Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2601
Purpose of sections.

For the purpose of promoting the public safety, health, welfare, convenience and enjoyment of public travel, to protect the public investment in public highways, and to preserve and enhance the scenic beauty of lands bordering public highways, it is declared to be in the public interest to regulate and restrict the location and maintenance of junkyards in areas adjacent to the Highway Beautification Control System within this state. The Legislature finds and declares that junkyards which do not conform to the requirements of sections 39-2601 to 39-2612 are public nuisances.

Laws 1971, LB 398, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 24.